Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB75.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Administer" means to directly apply glucagon;
(2) "Authorized entity" means a public, private, or parochial school that has a
trained individual present on the premises or officially associated with the entity
who is trained as required under Section 2 of this Act to receive and administer
undesignated glucagon;
(3) "Diabetes medical management plan" means a written, individualized health
plan designed to acknowledge and prepare for the health care needs of a student
diagnosed with diabetes that is prepared by the student's treating practitioner or
practitioner team;
(4) "Pharmacist" has the same meaning as in KRS 315.010;
(5) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.015;
(6) "Trained individual" means an individual who has successfully completed an
approved education training program under KRS 158.838; and
(7) "Undesignated glucagon" means glucagon prescribed in the name of an
authorized entity or trained individual in accordance with Sections 1 to 3 of this
Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A practitioner, acting within the practitioner's scope of practice, may prescribe
undesignated glucagon in the name of an authorized entity or trained individual
for use in accordance with this section.
(2) A pharmacist may dispense undesignated glucagon for a prescription issued in
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1004
the name of an authorized entity or trained individual.
(3) A trained individual who has successfully completed the training requirements
under KRS 158.838 may:
(a) Receive a prescription for undesignated glucagon from a practitioner or
pharmacist; and
(b) Administer undesignated glucagon in an emergency situation when a
school nurse or other licensed practitioner is not immediately available and
the trained individual believes in good faith that a student is experiencing
severe hypoglycemia or other conditions noted in that student's diabetes
medical management plan, regardless of whether that student has a
prescription for glucagon.
(4) An authorized entity that acquires and stocks a supply of undesignated glucagon
with a valid prescription shall:
(a) Store the undesignated glucagon in accordance with the manufacturer's
instructions and with any additional requirements established by the
Department for Public Health; and
(b) Designate a trained individual to be responsible for the storage,
maintenance, and general oversight of the undesignated glucagon acquired
by the authorized entity.
(5) Any authorized entity or trained individual that acquires and stocks a supply of
undesignated glucagon in accordance with this section shall notify an agent of
the local emergency medical services and the local emergency communications or
dispatch center of the existence, location, and type of glucagon acquired.
(6) Any authorized entity or trained individual that administers or provides
undesignated glucagon to a student who is experiencing severe hypoglycemia or
other conditions noted in that student's diabetes medical management plan shall
contact the student's parent, guardian, or emergency contact, and local
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1004
emergency medical services as soon as possible.
(7) The requirements of subsection (6) of this section shall not apply to any
individual who administers or provides undesignated glucagon if that individual
is acting as a Good Samaritan under KRS 313.035 and 411.148.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any authorized entity or trained individual that, in good faith and without
compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of undesignated
glucagon under Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall be immune from civil liability for
any personal injury resulting from the care or treatment, or resulting from any
act or failure to act in providing or arranging further medical treatment, if the
person acts as an ordinary, reasonably prudent person would have acted under
the same or similar circumstances.
(2) The immunity under subsection (1) of this section applies to:
(a) A practitioner who prescribes or authorizes the emergency use of
undesignated glucagon;
(b) A pharmacist who fills a prescription for undesignated glucagon;
(c) A trained individual who administers or provides undesignated glucagon;
(d) An authorized entity that acquires and stocks undesignated glucagon, or
provides undesignated glucagon to a trained individual; and
(e) An individual trainer or training entity providing the required training to a
trained individual.
(3) The immunity under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if the personal
injury results from the gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the
person rendering the care or treatment.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:14 PM Jacketed